Utah statutes.
73-18-7.1.   Fraudulent application for registration or certificate of title.

A person is guilty of a third degree felony if he:

(1)  fraudulently uses a false or fictitious name in any application for a registration or certificate of title for a motorboat, sailboat, or outboard motor; or

(2)  in making an application specified in Subsection (1), he:

(a)  knowingly makes a false statement;

(b)  knowingly conceals a material fact; or

(c)  otherwise commits a fraud.

